inc/V-CLASS_AANG_gt-norm.yaml
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: ñínyaang'ang'aawaa'ahlang
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: ñínyaang'ang'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: ñínyaang'ang'aawaa'ahlanggang
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: ñínyaang'ang'waa'ahl
     ñínyaang+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: ñínyaang'ang'waaäseehl
